incubator/apertium-mk-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="/i__lig">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>së</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="një__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="k/y__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëtë</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëtij</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëtij</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëtë</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ësaj</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ësaj</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëta</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëta</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëtyre</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ësosh</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëto</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëto</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëtyre</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ësosh</l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a/i__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tij</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tij</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>saj</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>saj</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tyre</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sosh</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>to</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>to</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tyre</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sosh</l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="ligature"><i/><par n="/i__lig"/></e>
    <e lm="një"><i>një</i><par n="një__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ai"><i>a</i><par n="a/i__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ky"><i>k</i><par n="k/y__det"/></e>
